Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3817
Registration procedures.

Registration shall be accomplished by filing a statement indicating the name and address of the trustee in which it acknowledges the trusteeship. The statement shall indicate whether the trust has been registered elsewhere. The statement shall identify the trust: (1) in the case of a testamentary trust, by the name of the testator and the date and place of domiciliary probate; (2) in the case of a written inter vivos trust, by the name of each settlor and the original trustee and the date of the trust instrument; or (3) in the case of an oral trust, by information identifying the settlor or other source of funds and describing the time and manner of the trust's creation and the terms of the trust, including the subject matter, beneficiaries, and time of performance.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 297, UPC § 7-102;

R.S.1943, (1995), § 30-2802;

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 17.